Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 4 Recognizance to Keep the Peace

12-4-1.
Examination on complaint of threat to commit offense.

Whenever complaint shall be made to any judge of the district court, or to any justice of the peace authorized to issue warrants within a division, that any person has, within the division, threatened to commit any crime or offense against the person or property of another, the judge or justice of the peace shall examine the complainant under oath or affirmation, and require his or her statement to be reduced to writing and be subscribed and sworn to by the complainant.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 152; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

12-4-1

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 15; P.L. 1972, ch. 169, § 12.

12-4-2.
Warrant to apprehend accused.

If the complainant shall then, before the judge or justice of the peace, enter into a recognizance in a sum not exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00), and with this surety, as the judge or justice of the peace shall direct and approve, with condition to prosecute the complaint with effect, or in default of prosecution to pay the costs that may accrue to the state, the judge or justice of the peace shall issue a warrant returnable immediately, annexing to the warrant the complaint, or reciting its substance in it, directed to the sheriff, deputy sheriffs, town sergeants, and town constables in the county in which the division is, and to the like officers in the county in which the accused may be supposed to belong, reside, or be found, and requiring the officer who shall be charged with the service of the warrant immediately to apprehend the accused and have him or her before the district court for the division in which the offense shall be alleged to have been committed.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 153; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

12-4-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 15; P.L. 2015, ch. 260, § 20; P.L. 2015, ch. 275, § 20.

Form of Recognizance.

A recognizance which omitted the words “to final judgment” in its statement “to prosecute such complaint to final judgment with effect” was valid. State v. McCarty,

4 R.I. 82

,

1856 R.I. LEXIS 13

(1856); State v. Palmer,

15 R.I. 6

, 22 A. 944,

1885 R.I. LEXIS 38

(1885).

12-4-3.
Inquiry into truth of complaint — Sentence to enter recognizance.

Whenever any accused party shall be brought before the court, the court shall inquire into the truth of the complaint. If it shall appear that the complaint is true and that there is reasonable cause to fear that the threat would be carried into execution, the accused person shall be sentenced to enter into recognizance with sufficient surety or sureties, and in any sum that the court shall direct, with condition to keep the peace towards all the people of this state, and especially towards the person against whom or against whose property the threat shall have been made, for a certain time thereafter not exceeding eleven (11) months, and to pay all the costs of prosecution and conviction.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 154; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 7; G.L. 1956, §

12-4-3

.

12-4-4.
Discharge of accused — Commitment on failure to give recognizance.

Upon complying with the sentence, the accused shall be discharged; but on neglecting so to do, he or she shall be committed to the adult correctional institutions, there to remain during the term of which he or she was sentenced to give recognizance, and until the costs are paid, and also all the costs of his or her commitment, or until he or she shall enter into the recognizance required by the sentence before some judge of the district court or justice of the peace authorized to take bail in the county, and pay the required costs.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 155; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

12-4-4

; P.L. 1969, ch. 239, § 15.

12-4-5.
Exemption from recognizance — Domestic abuse.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no requirement shall be made of any complainant to enter into a recognizance of any sum to prosecute a complaint for domestic assault.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 156; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 9; G.L. 1956, §

12-4-5

; P.L. 1977, ch. 259, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 23.

12-4-6.
Discharge on failure to find complaint supported by evidence — Costs.

If the district court before which the warrant shall be returned, or any warrant triable before it, upon which recognizance with surety for costs may be required by it, shall not consider the complaint, after trial, to be supported by the evidence adduced, the court shall immediately discharge the accused, and, as soon as may be, tax the costs that have accrued on it, including the attendance and travel of the witnesses summoned and present or sworn on the part of the complainant, and, if the costs are not paid within ten (10) days, shall issue execution for the costs against the complainant and his or her surety, returnable in twenty (20) days from the date of execution. The costs when collected shall be paid to the clerk, if there is any, or if not, to the justice, and be paid out by the clerk or justice to the several persons having right to them, or to the general treasurer.

History of Section.

C.P.A. 1905, § 157; G.L. 1909, ch. 281, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 331, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 501, § 10; G.L. 1956, §

12-4-6

.